Utah statutes.
26-53-201.   Adoption and enforcement of concussion and head injury policy -- Notice of policy to parent or guardian.

Each amateur sports organization shall:

(1)  adopt and enforce a concussion and head injury policy that:

(a)  is consistent with the requirements of Section 26-53-301; and

(b)  describes the nature and risk of:

(i)  a concussion or a traumatic head injury; and

(ii)  continuing to participate in a sporting event after sustaining a concussion or a traumatic head injury;

(2)  ensure that each agent of the amateur sports organization is familiar with, and has a copy of, the concussion and head injury policy; and

(3)  before permitting a child to participate in a sporting event of the amateur sports organization:

(a)  provide a written copy of the concussion and head injury policy to a parent or legal guardian of a child; and

(b)  obtain the signature of a parent or legal guardian of the child, acknowledging that the parent or legal guardian has read, understands, and agrees to abide by, the concussion and head injury policy.



Enacted by Chapter 97, 2011 General Session

